Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 19
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES -
VISITORS AND EMPLOYEES

17-19-101. Visitors at correctional facilities.

Any person who wishes to enter a correctional facility shall be asked, prior to entering the facility, to sign a consent form in which the visitor shall give his consent to be stopped and searched by a person of the same sex and to have his vehicle, if any, searched without probable cause while in the correctional facility. Said form shall be as promulgated by the executive director with the advice of the attorney general. A person who refuses to sign said form shall not be admitted to a correctional facility.

At each entrance to a correctional facility, the executive director shall cause to be displayed at all times in a prominent place a sign in English and in Spanish with a minimum height of two feet and a minimum width of three feet and with each letter to be a minimum of two inches in height, which shall read as follows:

"Correctional facility", as used in this section, means any facility under the supervision of the department in which persons are or may be lawfully held in custody as a result of conviction of a crime.

NOTICE

ANY PERSON WHO WISHES TO ENTER THIS CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL BE ASKED, PRIOR TO ENTERING THE FACILITY, TO SIGN A CONSENT FORM IN WHICH SAID PERSON SHALL GIVE HIS CONSENT TO BE STOPPED AND SEARCHED BY A PERSON OF THE SAME SEX AND TO HAVE HIS VEHICLE, IF ANY, SEARCHED WITHOUT PROBABLE CAUSE WHILE IN THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY. ANY PERSON WHO REFUSES TO SIGN SAID FORM SHALL NOT BE ADMITTED TO THIS CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 917, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-109 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For visitors at correctional facilities, see § 17-20-124.

17-19-102. Employees of correctional facilities.

Any person who wishes to become or to continue as an employee, including but not limited to contract employees and volunteers, of a correctional facility, as defined in section 17-19-101 (3), shall sign, as a condition of his or her employment or of volunteering, a consent form in which the employee or volunteer shall give his or her consent to be stopped and searched without probable cause by a person of the same sex while engaged in the performance of his or her duties within or around the correctional facility. Said form shall be as promulgated by the executive director with the advice of the attorney general.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 917, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 843, § 33, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-110 as it existed prior to 1977.